Louisiana, session 2026, SB284.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:194(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:66(H) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§66. Central Community School Board and school system; creation; membership;
qualifications; apportionment; election; powers, duties, and
functions; system operation
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 284
* * *
H.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
Central Community School Board is hereby authorized to contract with a
vendor to provide for the management for the school system's nutrition
program or for a particular school's nutrition program. The school board may
include provisions in the contract to train and schedule the school system's
support employees for school cafeterias, to plan menus, to manage nutrition
program budgets, to maintain inventory, to order supplies, or to oversee the
daily operations and upkeep of one or more school cafeterias.
(2) If the school board enters into a contract with a vendor, as authorized
by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the contract shall be consistent with
requirements to receive federal funding pursuant to the National School Lunch
Program or other federal nutrition programs, as determined by the state
Department of Education.
* * *
§194. Administration of nutrition program; general powers of governing authorities
of nutrition program providers; funds for privately supplied programs
for profit prohibited; exceptions
* * *
B.(1) The state Department of Education, pursuant to rules and regulations
promulgated by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, may
employ personnel and take other action it may deem necessary to provide for the
establishment, maintenance, and expansion of any nutrition program and to direct the
disbursement of federal and state funds in accordance with any applicable provisions
of federal or state law.
(2) However, no state appropriated funds shall be disbursed for the support
of any nutrition program which shall be used by any private person, enterprise,
concern, or other entity for profit, regardless of any authority in federal or state law
for contracting with such a private supplier or provider of nutrition programs, except
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 284
with regard to the following:
(1)(a) The Child and Adult Care Food Program, as provided in regulations
issued by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(2)(b) Any elementary or secondary school operated by Louisiana State
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College or by Southern University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College.
(c) Any elementary or secondary school operated by the Central
Community School Board.
* * *
Section 2. It is the intention of the legislature to authorize the Central Community
School Board to contract for the management of the school system's nutrition program.
Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to require or mandate such contracts in any manner that
would violate the provisions of Article III, Section 12 of the Constitution of Louisiana which
prohibits the regulating or management of parish or city school systems.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.